Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Chapter 17. Transportation Development and Revenue Bond Act.

§ 33.2-1700.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Board”
means the Commonwealth Transportation Board, or if the Commonwealth Transportation Board is abolished, any board, commission, or officer succeeding to the principal functions thereof or upon whom the powers given by this chapter to the Board shall be given by law.

“Cost of the project,”
as applied to a project to be acquired by purchase or by condemnation, includes:

The purchase price or the amount of the award;

The cost of improvements, financing charges, and interest during any period of disuse before completion of improvements;

The cost of traffic estimates and of engineering data;

The cost of engineering and legal expenses;

The cost of plans, specifications and surveys, and estimates of cost and of revenues; and

Other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the enterprises, administrative expenses, and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the financing authorized in this chapter and the acquisition of the project and the placing of the project in operation.“Cost of the project,” as applied to a project to be constructed, includes:

1.

The cost of construction;

2.

The cost of all lands, properties, rights, easements, and franchises acquired that are deemed necessary for such construction;

3.

The cost of acquiring by purchase or condemnation any ferry that is deemed by the Board to be competitive with any bridge to be constructed;

4.

The cost of all machinery and equipment;

5.

The cost of financing charges and interest prior to construction, during construction, and for one year after completion of construction;

6.

The cost of traffic estimates and of engineering data;

The cost of engineering and legal expenses;

The cost of plans, specifications and surveys, estimates of cost and of revenues; and

Other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the enterprise, administrative expenses, and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the financing authorized in this chapter, the construction of the project, the placing of the project in operation, and the condemnation of property necessary for such construction and operation.“Improvements” means those repairs to, replacements of, additions to, and betterments of a project acquired by purchase or by condemnation as are deemed necessary to place it in a safe and efficient condition for the use of the public, if such repairs, replacements, additions, and betterments are ordered prior to the sale of any bonds for the acquisition of such project.“Owner” includes all individuals, incorporated companies, partnerships, societies, and associations having any title or interest in any property rights, easements, or franchises authorized to be acquired by this chapter.“Project” means any one or more of the following:

1.

The York River Bridges, extending from a point within Yorktown in York County or within York County across the York River to Gloucester Point or some point in Gloucester County.

2.

The Rappahannock River Bridge, extending from Greys Point, or its vicinity, in Middlesex County, across the Rappahannock River to a point in the vicinity of White Stone, in Lancaster County, or at some other feasible point in the general vicinity of the two respective points.

3.

The James River Bridge, from a point at or near Jamestown, in James City County, across the James River to a point in Surry County.

4.

The James River, Chuckatuck, and Nansemond River Bridges, together with necessary connecting roads, in the Cities of Newport News and Suffolk and the County of Isle of Wight.

5.

The Hampton Roads Bridge-Tunnel or Bridge and Tunnel System, extending from a point or points in the Cities of Newport News and Hampton on the northwest shore of Hampton Roads across Hampton Roads to a point or points in the City of Norfolk or Suffolk on the southeast shore of Hampton Roads.

6.

Interstate 264, extending from a point in the vicinity of the intersection of Interstate 64 and U.S. Route 58 at Norfolk to some feasible point between London Bridge and U.S. Route 60.

7.

The Henrico-James River Bridge, extending from a point on the eastern shore of the James River in Henrico County to a point on the western shore, between Falling Creek and Bells Road interchanges of Interstate 95; however, the project shall be deemed to include all property, rights, easements, and franchises relating to this project and deemed necessary or convenient for its operation, including its approaches.

8.

The limited access highway between the Newport News/Williamsburg International Airport area and the Newport News downtown area, which generally runs parallel to tracks of the Chesapeake and Ohio Railroad.

9.

Transportation improvements in the Dulles Corridor, with an eastern terminus of the East Falls Church Metrorail station at Interstate 66 and a western terminus of Virginia Route 772 in Loudoun County, including without limitation the Dulles Toll Road; the Dulles Access Road; outer roadways adjacent or parallel thereto; mass transit, including rail; bus rapid transit; and capacity-enhancing treatments such as high-occupancy vehicle lanes, high-occupancy toll lanes, interchange improvements, commuter parking lots, and other transportation management strategies.

Subject to the limitations and approvals of §

33.2-1712

, any other highway for a primary highway transportation improvement district or transportation service district that the Board has agreed to finance under a contract with any such district or any other alternative mechanism for generation of local revenues for specific funding of a project satisfactory to the Board, the financing for which is to be secured by Transportation Trust Fund revenues under any appropriation made by the General Assembly for that purpose and payable first from revenues received under such contract or other local funding source; second, to the extent required, from funds appropriated and allocated, pursuant to the highway allocation formula as provided by law, to the highway construction district in which the project is located or to the county or counties in which the project is located; and third, to the extent required from other legally available revenues of the Transportation Trust Fund and from any other available source of funds.

The U.S. Route 58 Corridor Development Program projects as defined in §§

33.2-2300

and

33.2-2301

.

The Northern Virginia Transportation District Program as defined in §§

33.2-2400

and

33.2-2401

.

Any program for highways or mass transit or transportation facilities endorsed by the affected localities, which agree that certain distributions of state recordation taxes will be dedicated and used for the payment of any bonds or other obligations, including interest thereon, the proceeds of which were used to pay the cost of the program. Any such program shall be referred to as a “Transportation Improvement Program.”

Any project designated by the General Assembly financed in whole or part through the issuance of Commonwealth of Virginia Federal Highway Reimbursement Anticipation Notes.

Any project authorized by the General Assembly financed in whole or in part by funds from the Priority Transportation Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1527

or from the proceeds of bonds whose debt service is paid in whole or in part by funds from such Fund.

Any project identified by the Board to be financed in whole or in part through the issuance of Commonwealth of Virginia Federal Transportation Grant Anticipation Revenue Notes.

The Interstate 81 Corridor Improvement Program projects as defined in §§

33.2-3600

and

33.2-3602

.

Railroad and other infrastructure improvements leading into Washington, D.C., from Virginia and new Metrorail-related improvements to, and serving, the Rosslyn Metrorail station in Arlington County.“Revenues” includes tolls and any other moneys received or pledged by the Board pursuant to this chapter, including legally available Transportation Trust Fund revenues and any federal highway reimbursements and any other federal highway assistance received by the Commonwealth.“Toll project” means a project financed in whole or in part through the issuance of revenue bonds that are secured by toll revenues generated by the project.“Undertaking” means all of the projects authorized to be acquired or constructed under this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-228; 1950, p. 145; 1954, c. 578; 1956, c. 158; 1962, c. 273; 1964, c. 558; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-268; 1972, c. 2; 1974, cc. 52, 297; 1982, c. 261; 1986, Sp. Sess., c. 13; 1988, cc. 844, 903; 1989, Sp. Sess., cc. 9, 11; 1990, c. 710; 1991, cc. 666, 713; 1993, cc. 391, 793; 1994, cc. 520, 589; 1995, c. 354; 2000, cc. 1019, 1044; 2004, c. 807; 2007, c. 896; 2011, cc. 830, 868; 2014, c. 805; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, and added subdivisions 17 and 18 to the definition “Project.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Turnpikes and Tollroads, § 9.

§ 33.2-1701.
General powers of Commonwealth Transportation Board.

The Board may, subject to the provisions of this chapter:

Acquire by purchase or by condemnation, construct, improve, operate, and maintain any one or more of the projects mentioned and included in the undertaking as defined in §

33.2-1700

;

Issue revenue bonds of the Commonwealth to be known and designated as “Commonwealth of Virginia Toll Revenue Bonds,” payable from earnings and from any other available sources of funds, to pay the cost of such projects;

Subject to the limitations and approvals of §

33.2-1712

, issue revenue bonds of the Commonwealth to be known and designated as “Commonwealth of Virginia Transportation Contract Revenue Bonds,” secured by Transportation Trust Fund revenues under a payment agreement between the Board and the Treasury Board, subject to their appropriation by the General Assembly and payable first from revenues received pursuant to contracts with a primary highway transportation improvement district or transportation service district or other local revenue sources for which specific funding of any such bonds may be authorized by law; second, to the extent required, from funds appropriated and allocated, pursuant to the highway allocation formula as provided by law, to the highway construction district in which the project to be financed is located or to the county or counties in which the project to be financed is located; and third, to the extent required, from other legally available revenues of the Transportation Trust Fund and from any other available source of funds;

Issue revenue bonds of the Commonwealth to be known and designated as “Commonwealth of Virginia Transportation Revenue Bonds,” secured (i) by revenues received from the U.S. Route 58 Corridor Development Fund, subject to their appropriation by the General Assembly; (ii) to the extent required, from revenues legally available from the Transportation Trust Fund; and (iii) to the extent required, from any other legally available funds that have been appropriated by the General Assembly;

Issue revenue bonds of the Commonwealth to be known and designated as “Commonwealth of Virginia Transportation Revenue Bonds,” secured, subject to their appropriation by the General Assembly, (i) first from revenues received from the Northern Virginia Transportation District Fund; (ii) to the extent required, from funds appropriated and allocated, pursuant to the highway allocation formula as provided by law, to the highway construction district in which the project to be financed is located or to the city or county in which the project to be financed is located; (iii) to the extent required, from legally available revenues of the Transportation Trust Fund; and (iv) from such other funds that may be appropriated by the General Assembly;

Issue revenue bonds of the Commonwealth to be known and designated as “Commonwealth of Virginia Transportation Program Revenue Bonds,” secured, subject to their appropriation by the General Assembly, (i) first from any revenues received from any Set-aside Fund established by the General Assembly pursuant to §

58.1-816.1

; (ii) to the extent required, from revenues received pursuant to any contract with a locality or any alternative mechanism for generation of local revenues for specific funding of a project satisfactory to the Board; (iii) to the extent required, from funds appropriated and allocated, pursuant to the highway allocation formula as provided by law, to the highway construction district in which the project to be financed is located or to the city or county in which the project to be financed is located; (iv) to the extent required, from legally available revenues of the Transportation Trust Fund; and (v) from such other funds that may be appropriated by the General Assembly. No bonds for any project shall be issued under the authority of this subdivision unless such project is specifically included in a bill or resolution passed by the General Assembly;

Issue revenue bonds of the Commonwealth to be known and designated as “Commonwealth of Virginia Transportation Program Revenue Bonds,” secured, subject to their appropriation by the General Assembly, (i) first from any revenues received from the Commonwealth Transit Capital Fund established by the General Assembly pursuant to §

33.2-1526.2

; (ii) to the extent required, from legally available revenues of the Transportation Trust Fund; and (iii) from such other funds that may be appropriated by the General Assembly. No bonds for any project shall be issued under the authority of this subdivision unless such project is specifically included in a bill or resolution passed by the General Assembly;

Issue revenue bonds of the Commonwealth to be known and designated as “Commonwealth of Virginia Federal Highway Reimbursement Anticipation Notes,” secured, subject to their appropriation by the General Assembly, (i) first from any federal highway reimbursements and any other federal highway assistance received by the Commonwealth; (ii) then, at the discretion of the Board, to the extent required, from legally available revenues of the Transportation Trust Fund; and (iii) then from such other funds, if any, that are designated by the General Assembly for such purpose;

Issue revenue bonds of the Commonwealth to be known and designated as “Commonwealth of Virginia Credit Assistance Revenue Bonds,” secured, subject to their appropriation by the General Assembly, solely from revenues with respect to or generated by the project being financed thereby and any tolls or other revenues pledged by the Board as security therefor and in accordance with the applicable federal credit assistance authorized with respect to such project by the U.S. Department of Transportation;

Issue revenue bonds of the Commonwealth to be known and designated as “Commonwealth of Virginia Transportation Capital Projects Revenue Bonds,” secured, subject to their appropriation by the General Assembly, (i) from the revenues deposited into the Priority Transportation Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1527

; (ii) to the extent required, from revenues legally available from the Transportation Trust Fund; and (iii) to the extent required, from any other legally available funds;

Issue grant anticipation notes of the Commonwealth from time to time to be known and designated as “Commonwealth of Virginia Federal Transportation Grant Anticipation Revenue Notes,” secured, subject to their appropriation by the General Assembly, (i) first from the project-specific reimbursements pursuant to §

33.2-1520

; (ii) then, at the discretion of the Board, to the extent required, from legally available revenues of the Transportation Trust Fund; and (iii) then from such other funds, if any, that are designated by the General Assembly for such purpose;

Issue revenue bonds of the Commonwealth to be known and designated as “Commonwealth of Virginia Interstate 81 Program Revenue Bonds,” secured, subject to appropriation by the General Assembly, by revenues received from the Interstate 81 Corridor Improvement Fund from deposits thereto pursuant to §

58.1-2299.20

derived from the receipt of the regional fuels tax levied pursuant to §

58.1-2295

;

Fix and collect tolls and other charges for the use of such projects or to refinance the cost of such projects;

Construct grade separations at intersections of any projects with public highways, railways, or streets and adjust the lines and grades thereof so as to accommodate the same to the design of such grade separations, the cost of such grade separations and any damage incurred in adjusting the lines and grades of such highways, railways, or streets to be ascertained and paid by the Board as a part of the cost of the project;

Vacate or change the location of any portion of any public highway and reconstruct the same at such new location as the Board deems most favorable for the project and of substantially the same type and in as good condition as the original highway, the cost of such reconstruction and any damage incurred in vacating or changing the location thereof to be ascertained and paid by the Board as a part of the cost of the project. Any public highway vacated or relocated by the Board shall be vacated or relocated in the manner provided by law for the vacation or relocation of public highways, and any damages awarded on account thereof may be paid by the Board as a part of the cost of the project;

Make reasonable regulations for the installation, construction, maintenance, repair, renewal, and relocation of pipes, mains, sewers, conduits, cables, wires, towers, poles, and other equipment and appliances, referred to in this subdivision as “public utility facilities,” of the Commonwealth and of any locality, political subdivision, public utility, or public service corporation owning or operating the same in, on, along, over, or under the project. Whenever the Board determines that it is necessary that any such public utility facilities should be relocated or removed, the Commonwealth or such locality, political subdivision, public utility, or public service corporation shall relocate or remove the same in accordance with the order of the Board. The cost and expense of such relocation or removal, including the cost of installing such public utility facilities in a new location or locations, the cost of any lands or any rights or interests in lands, and any other rights acquired to accomplish such relocation or removal, shall be ascertained by the Board.On any toll project, the Board shall pay the cost and expense of relocation or removal as a part of the cost of the project for those public utility facilities owned or operated by the Commonwealth or such locality, political subdivision, public utility, or public service corporation. On all other projects under this chapter, the Board shall pay the cost and expense of relocation or removal as a part of the cost of the project for those public utility facilities owned or operated by the Commonwealth or such locality or political subdivision. The Commonwealth or such locality, political subdivision, public utility, or public service corporation may maintain and operate such public utility facilities with the necessary appurtenances in the new location for as long a period and upon the same terms and conditions as it had the right to maintain and operate such public utility facilities in their former location;

Acquire by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any lands, property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other property, including public lands, parks, playgrounds, reservations, highways, or parkways, or parts thereof or rights therein, of any locality or political subdivision, deemed necessary or convenient for the construction or the efficient operation of the project or necessary in the restoration, replacement, or relocation of public or private property damaged or destroyed.The cost of such projects shall be paid solely from the proceeds of Commonwealth of Virginia Toll or Transportation Contract Revenue Bonds or a combination thereof or from such proceeds and from any grant or contribution that may be made thereto pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Board shall be authorized to exercise the powers conferred in this chapter, in addition to its general powers to acquire rights-of-way and to construct, operate, and maintain state highways, with respect to any project that the General Assembly has authorized or may hereafter authorize to be financed in whole or in part through the issuance of bonds of the Commonwealth pursuant to the provisions of Article X, Section 9 (c) of the Constitution of Virginia;

Enter into any agreements or take such other actions as the Board determines in connection with applying for or obtaining any federal credit assistance, including without limitation loan guarantees and lines of credit, pursuant to authorization from the U.S. Department of Transportation with respect to any project included in the Commonwealth’s long-range transportation plan and the approved State Transportation Improvement Program; and

Issue revenue bonds of the Commonwealth to be known and designated as “Commonwealth of Virginia Passenger Rail Facilities Bonds,” secured, subject to their appropriation by the General Assembly from net revenues resulting from tolls, rates, fees, and charges for or in connection with the use, occupancy, and services of the Transform 66 Inside the Beltway express lanes project and remaining after payment of expenses incurred in operating such project’s toll facilities.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-229; 1954, c. 319; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-269; 1982, c. 403; 1986, Sp. Sess., c. 13; 1988, cc. 844, 903; 1989, Sp. Sess., cc. 9, 11; 1990, c. 710; 1991, cc. 666, 713; 1993, cc. 391, 793; 1994, cc. 233, 520, 589, 662; 1995, c. 354; 1996, cc. 23, 143; 1999, c. 898; 2000, cc. 1019, 1044; 2004, c. 807; 2007, c. 896; 2011, cc. 830, 868; 2013, c. 639; 2014, c. 805; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, substituted “§

33.2-1526.2

” for “subdivision A 4 c of §

58.1-638

” in clause (i) of subdivision 7; added subdivision 12; added subdivision 13 designator; substituted subdivision 14 designator for subdivision 13 designator; substituted subdivision 15 designator for subdivision 14 designator; substituted subdivision 16 designator for subdivision 15 designator; substituted subdivision 17 designator for subdivision 16 designator; substituted subdivision 18 designator for subdivision 17 designator; substituted subdivision 19 designator for subdivision 18 designator; added subdivision 20.

§ 33.2-1702.
Acquisition and construction of projects.

The Board shall acquire or construct, under the provisions of this chapter, each of the projects included in the undertaking at the earliest dates deemed by the Board to be feasible for the acquisition or construction of each project and its financing under this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-230; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-270; 1986, Sp. Sess., c. 13; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1703.
Purchase of projects.

The Board may acquire by purchase, whenever it deems such purchase expedient, any of the projects set forth in the definition of “project” in §

33.2-1700

, upon such terms and at such prices as may be reasonable and can be agreed upon between the Board and the owner thereof, title thereto to be taken in the name of the Commonwealth. The Board shall issue revenue bonds of the Commonwealth as provided in this chapter to pay the cost of such acquisition.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-231; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-271; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1704.
Condemnation of projects and property.

Whenever a reasonable price cannot be agreed upon or whenever the owner is legally incapacitated, absent, unable to convey valid title, or unknown, the Board may acquire by condemnation any project contemplated by §

33.2-1703

or interest therein and any lands, rights, easements, franchises, and other property deemed necessary or convenient for the improvement or the efficient operation of any project acquired or constructed under this chapter, or for the purpose of constructing any project or portion thereof pursuant to this chapter, or for securing a right-of-way leading to any such project or its approaches, in the manner provided in this chapter. Such condemnation proceedings shall be conducted and the compensation to be paid shall be ascertained and paid in the manner provided by law with reference to the condemnation of property by the Board for state highway purposes.

Title to any property condemned by the Board shall be taken in the name of the Commonwealth. The Commonwealth shall be under no obligation to accept and pay for any property condemned or any cost incidental to any condemnation proceedings and shall not pay for the same except from the funds provided by this chapter; and in any condemnation proceedings, the court having jurisdiction of the suit, action, or proceeding may make such orders as may be just to the Commonwealth and to the owners of the property to be condemned and may require an undertaking or other security to secure such owners against any loss or damage to be sustained by reason of the failure of the Commonwealth to accept and pay for the property, but such undertaking or security shall impose no liability upon the Commonwealth, except such as may be paid from the funds provided under the authority of this chapter, provided that condemnation shall not lie in any case when the Commonwealth, in granting a franchise to any project named in this chapter, has stipulated the terms upon which it may acquire such project.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-232; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-272; 1991, cc. 666, 713; 1993, c. 793; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1705.
Improvement of projects acquired.

The Board, at or before the time any such project is acquired by purchase or by condemnation, shall determine what repairs, replacements, additions, or betterments will be necessary to place the project in safe and efficient condition for the use of the public and shall cause an estimate of the cost of such improvement to be made. The Board shall authorize such improvements before the sale of any revenue bonds for the acquisition of such project, and the cost of such improvements shall be paid for out of the proceeds of such bonds.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-233; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-273; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1706.
Construction of projects.

The Board may construct, whenever it deems such construction expedient, any of the projects set forth in the definition of “project” in §

33.2-1700

. The Board may purchase within the Commonwealth, solely from funds provided under the authority of this chapter, such lands, structures, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other interests in lands, including lands under water and riparian rights of any person, partnership, association, railroad or other corporation, or municipality or political subdivision, deemed necessary for the construction of any project, upon such terms and at such prices as may be considered by it to be reasonable and can be agreed upon between it and the owner thereof and may take title thereto in the name of the Commonwealth. The Commonwealth hereby consents to the use of all lands lying under water that are within the Commonwealth and are necessary for the construction and operation of any project and the approaches and appurtenances thereto that may be constructed under the provisions of this chapter. All public or private property damaged or destroyed in carrying out the powers granted hereunder shall be restored or repaired and placed in the original condition, as nearly as practicable, or adequate compensation made therefor, out of funds provided under the authority of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-234; 1950, p. 147; 1962, c. 273; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-274; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1707.
Highway connections.

Upon the letting of a contract for the construction of a project under the provisions of this chapter, the Board shall proceed with the construction of any highways that may be necessary to connect the project with state highways in the Commonwealth and to complete the construction of the connecting highways on or before the date the project is opened for traffic.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-235; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-275; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1708.
Revenue bonds.

The Board may provide by resolution, at one time or from time to time, for the issuance of revenue bonds, notes, or other revenue obligations of the Commonwealth for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost, as defined in §

33.2-1700

, of any one or more projects, as defined in §

33.2-1700

. The principal or purchase price of, and redemption premium, if any, and interest on such obligations shall be payable solely from the special funds herein provided for such payment. For the purposes of this section, “special funds” includes any funds established for Commonwealth of Virginia Toll Revenue Bonds, Commonwealth of Virginia Transportation Contract Revenue Bonds, Commonwealth of Virginia Transportation Revenue Bonds, Commonwealth of Virginia Interstate 81 Program Revenue Bonds, Commonwealth of Virginia Federal Highway Reimbursement Anticipation Notes, or Commonwealth of Virginia Federal Transportation Grant Anticipation Revenue Notes, or Commonwealth of Virginia Passenger Rail Facilities Bonds.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-236; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-276; 1988, cc. 844, 903; 1989, Sp. Sess., cc. 9, 11; 2000, cc. 1019, 1044; 2011, cc. 830, 868; 2014, c. 805; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, inserted “Commonwealth of Virginia Interstate 81 Program Revenue Bonds” following “Transportation Revenue Bonds,” and inserted “or Commonwealth of Virginia Passenger Rail Facilities Bonds” at the end.